nl: Microfoon voorversterker vormfactor: 500-serie module; Kanaalstrip; Op bureau; Half-rack; Inline/cilinder; Pedaal; Draagbaar op batterij; Rackmontage 1U; Rackmontage 2U; Rackmontage 3U+; Andere
ru: Формфактор предусилителя микрофона: Модуль серии 500; Канальная линейка; ПК; Полустоечный; Линейный/цилиндрический; Педаль; Портативный на батарейках; Стоечный 1U; Стоечный 2U; Стоечный 3U+; Другой
de: Kompressions-Schaltungstyp: 500er-Serie-Modul; Kanalzug; Desktop; Halbrack; Inline/Zylinder; Pedal; Tragbar batteriebetrieben; Rackmontage 1HE; Rackmontage 2HE; Rackmontage 3HE+; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Tvar predzosilňovača mikrofónu: Modul série 500; Kanálový pás; Osobný počítač; Polovičný rack; Inline/valcový; Pedál; Prenosný na batérie; Rackový 1U; Rackový 2U; Rackový 3U+; Iné
es: Factor de forma del preamplificador de micrófono: Módulo serie 500; Canal completo; Escritorio; Medio rack; En línea/Barril; Pedal; Portátil con batería; Montaje en rack 1U; Montaje en rack 2U; Montaje en rack 3U+; Otros
el: Μορφή προενισχυτή μικροφώνου: Μονάδα σειράς 500; Channel Strip; Επιτραπέζιο; Μισό rack; Ενσωματωμένο/κυλινδρικό; Πετάλι; Φορητό με μπαταρία; Rackmount 1U; Rackmount 2U; Rackmount 3U+; Άλλο
bg-BG: Типоразмер на микрофонен предусилвател: Модул от серия 500; Канална лента; Настолен; Половин рак; Вграден/Цилиндричен; Педал; Преносим с батерийно захранване; Рак монтаж 1U; Рак монтаж 2U; Рак монтаж 3U+; Други
pl: Obudowa przedwzmacniacza mikrofonowego: Moduł serii 500; Kanał; Desktop; Półrack; Liniowy/baryłkowy; Pedał; Przenośny zasilany bateryjnie; Montaż w szafie rack 1U; Montaż w szafie rack 2U; Montaż w szafie rack 3U+; Inne
cs: Provedení mikrofonního předzesilovače: 500 Series modul; Channel Strip; Stolní; Poloviční rack; Inline/válcový; Šlapací; Přenosný napájený baterií; Rackmount 1U; Rackmount 2U; Rackmount 3U+; Jiné
da: Mikrofonforstærkerens formfaktor: 500-serie modul; Kanalstrimmel; Desktop; Halv-rack; Inline/tønde; Pedal; Bærbar batteridrevet; Rackmonteret 1U; Rackmonteret 2U; Rackmonteret 3U+; Andet
zh-CN: 麦克风前置放大器外形: 500 系列模块; 通道条; 桌面式; 半机架; 内联式/筒式; 踏板; 便携式电池供电; 机架式 1U; 机架式 2U; 机架式 3U+; 其他
pt-PT: Formato do pré-amplificador de microfone: Módulo série 500; Channel strip; De secretária; Meia rack; Em linha/Barril; Pedal; Portátil com bateria; Montagem em rack 1U; Montagem em rack 2U; Montagem em rack 3U+; Outro
ja: マイクプリアンプフォームファクター: 500 シリーズモジュール; チャンネルストリップ; デスクトップ; ハーフラック; インライン/バレル; ペダル; ポータブルバッテリー駆動; ラックマウント 1U; ラックマウント 2U; ラックマウント 3U+; その他
fr: Facteur de forme du préampli micro: Module série 500; Tranche de console; Bureau; Demi-rack; En ligne/Baril; Pédale; Portable à piles; Rack 1U; Rack 2U; Rack 3U+; Autre
pt-BR: Formato do pré-amplificador de microfone: Módulo série 500; Channel strip; Desktop; Meia rack; Inline/cilindro; Pedal; Portátil a bateria; Rack 1U; Rack 2U; Rack 3U+; Outro
nb: Mikrofon forforsterker formfaktor: 500-serie modul; Kanalstripe; Skrivebord; Halvrack; Innebygd/tønne; Pedal; Bærbar batteridrevet; Rackmontering 1U; Rackmontering 2U; Rackmontering 3U+; Annet
lt-LT: Mikrofono preampo formos faktorius: 500 serijos modulis; Kanalo juosta; Stalinis; Pusė stelažo; Linijinis/cilindro formos; Pedalinis; Nešiojamas su baterija; Montavimas į stelažą 1U; Montavimas į stelažą 2U; Montavimas į stelažą 3U+; Kita
en: Microphone preamp form factor: 500 Series Module; Channel Strip; Desktop; Half-rack; Inline/Barrel; Pedal; Portable battery-powered; Rackmount 1U; Rackmount 2U; Rackmount 3U+; Other
tr: Mikrofon preamplifikatörü form faktörü: 500 serisi modül; Kanal şeridi; Masaüstü; Yarım rack; Satır içi/Namlu; Pedallı; Taşınabilir pilli; Rack montaj 1U; Rack montaj 2U; Rack montaj 3U+; Diğer
sl-SI: Oblika mikrofonskega predojačevalnika: Modul serije 500; Kanalni trak; Namizna; Pol-stenski; Vgradni/cevni; Pedal; Prenosni baterijski; Stenski nosilec 1U; Stenski nosilec 2U; Stenski nosilec 3U+; Drugo
ko: 마이크 프리앰프 폼 팩터: 500 시리즈 모듈; 채널 스트립; 데스크탑; 하프 랙; 인라인/배럴; 페달; 휴대용 배터리식; 랙마운트 1U; 랙마운트 2U; 랙마운트 3U+; 기타
hr-HR: Oblik mikrofonskog pretpojačala: Modul serije 500; Kanalna traka; Stolno; Polu-rack; Ugrađeni/bačvasti; Pedala; Prijenosni s baterijskim napajanjem; Rack montaža 1U; Rack montaža 2U; Rack montaža 3U+; Ostalo
vi: Kiểu dáng tiền khuếch đại microphone: Module dòng 500; Dải kênh; Để bàn; Nửa rack; Nội tuyến/Hình trụ; Bàn đạp; Di động dùng pin; Gắn rack 1U; Gắn rack 2U; Gắn rack 3U+; Khác
fi: Mikrofonin esivahvistimen muototekijä: 500-sarjan moduuli; Kanavaliuska; Työpöytä; Puoliteline; Linjaan/putkimallinen; Polkimet; Kannettava akkukäyttöinen; Telinemalli 1U; Telinemalli 2U; Telinemalli 3U+; Muu
th: รูปแบบของปรีแอมป์ไมโครโฟน: โมดูล 500 ซีรีส์; แชนเนลสตริป; สำหรับตั้งโต๊ะ; ครึ่งแร็ก; อินไลน์/บาเรล; แป้นเหยียบ; พกพาใช้แบตเตอรี่; แร็กเมาท์ 1U; แร็กเมาท์ 2U; แร็กเมาท์ 3U+; อื่นๆ
sv: Mikrofonförstärkares formfaktor: 500-serie modul; Kanalremsa; Desktop; Halvrack; In-line/cylindrisk; Pedal; Bärbar batteridriven; Rackmonterad 1U; Rackmonterad 2U; Rackmonterad 3U+; Övrigt
zh-TW: 麥克風前置放大器外型規格: 500 系列模組; 通道條; 桌上型; 半機架式; 直插式/筒狀; 踏板; 可攜式電池供電; 機架式 1U; 機架式 2U; 機架式 3U+; 其他
hu: Mikrofon-előerősítő formátum: 500-as sorozatú modul; Csatorna sáv; Asztali; Félrack; Inline/hengeres; Pedálos; Hordozható akkumulátoros; Rack szerelvény 1U; Rack szerelvény 2U; Rack szerelvény 3U+; Egyéb
it: Fattore di forma del preamplificatore microfonico: Modulo serie 500; Channel strip; Desktop; Mezzo rack; In linea/cilindrico; Pedale; Portatile a batteria; Rack 1U; Rack 2U; Rack 3U+; Altro
ro-RO: Factor de formă preamplificator microfon: Modul seria 500; Canal de procesare; Desktop; Jumătate de rack; În linie/cilindric; Pedală; Portabil cu baterie; Montaj în rack 1U; Montaj în rack 2U; Montaj în rack 3U+; Altele